Washington statutes.
RCW 39.102.170

Limitation on bonds issued. (Expires June 30, 2044.)

The bonds issued by a sponsoring local government under RCW 39.102.150 to finance public improvements shall not constitute an obligation of the state of Washington, either general or special.

[ 2006 c 181 s 503.]